Illinois, session 104th, HB1619.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cemetery Care Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 14, and 15a and by adding Sections 3.1, 64.1, and 4.2 as follows: 7    (760 ILCS 100/2)  (from Ch. 21, par. 64.2)8    Sec. 2. Definitions. The following words, terms and 9phrases used in this Act, for the purpose of this Act, have the 10following meanings:11    "Person" means any person, partnership, association, 12corporation, or other entity.13    "Trustee" means any person authorized to hold funds under 14this Act.15    "Comptroller" means the Comptroller of the State of 16Illinois.17    "Care" means the maintenance of a cemetery and of the 18lots, graves, crypts, niches, family mausoleums, memorials, 19and markers therein; including: (i) the cutting and trimming 20of lawn, shrubs, and trees at reasonable intervals; (ii) 21keeping in repair the drains, water lines, roads, buildings, 22fences, and other structures, in keeping with a well 23maintained cemetery; (iii) maintenance of machinery, tools,   HB1619 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1and equipment for such care; (iv) compensation of employees, 2payment of insurance premiums, and reasonable payments for 3employees pension and other benefits plans; and (v) to the 4extent surplus income from the care fund is available, the 5payment of overhead expenses necessary for such purposes and 6for maintaining necessary records of lot ownership, transfers, 7and burials.8    "Care funds" as distinguished from receipts from annual 9charges or gifts for current or annual care, means any realty 10or personalty impressed with a trust by the terms of any gift, 11grant, contribution, payment, legacy, or pursuant to contract, 12accepted by any cemetery authority owning, operating, 13controlling or managing a privately operated cemetery, or by 14any trustee or licensee, agent or custodian for the same, 15under Section 3 of this Act, and the amounts set aside under 16Section 4 of this Act, and any income accumulated therefrom, 17where legally so directed by the terms of the transaction by 18which the principal was established.19    "Cemetery" means any land or structure in this State 20dedicated to and used, or intended to be used, for the 21interment of human remains.22    "Cemetery authority" means any person, firm, corporation, 23trustee, partnership, association or municipality owning, 24operating, controlling or managing a cemetery or holding lands 25for burial grounds or burial purposes in this State.26    "Mausoleum crypt" means a space in a mausoleum used or   HB1619 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1intended to be used, above or under ground, to entomb human 2remains.3    "Family burying ground" means a cemetery in which no lots 4are sold to the public and in which interments are restricted 5to a group of persons related to each other by blood or 6marriage.7    "Fraternal cemetery" means a cemetery owned, operated, 8controlled, or managed by any fraternal organization or 9auxiliary organizations thereof, in which the sale of lots, 10graves, crypts or niches is restricted principally to its 11members.12    "Grave" means a space of ground in a cemetery, used, or 13intended to be used, for burial.14    "Investment Company Act of 1940" means Title 15, of the 15United States Code, Sections 80a-1 to 80a-51, inclusive, as 16amended.17    "Investment Company" means any issuer (a) whose securities 18are purchasable only with care funds or trust funds, or both; 19and (b) which is an open and diversified management company as 20defined in and registered under the "Investment Company Act of 211940"; and (c) which has entered into an agreement with the 22Comptroller containing such provisions as the Comptroller by 23regulation reasonably requires for the proper administration 24of this Act.25    "Municipal cemetery" means a cemetery owned, operated, 26controlled or managed by any city, village, incorporated town,   HB1619 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1township, county, or other municipal corporation, political 2subdivision, or instrumentality thereof authorized by law to 3own, operate, or manage a cemetery.4    "Niche" means a space in a columbarium used or intended to 5be used, for inurnment of cremated human remains.6    "Privately operated cemetery" means any entity that offers 7interment rights, entombment rights, or inurnment rights, 8other than a fraternal, municipal, State, federal or religious 9cemetery or a family burying ground.10    "Religious cemetery" means a cemetery owned, operated, 11controlled, or managed by any recognized church, religious 12society, association or denomination, or by any cemetery 13authority or any corporation administering, or through which 14is administered, the temporalities of any recognized church, 15religious society, association or denomination.16    "State or federal cemetery" means a cemetery owned, 17operated, controlled, or managed by any State or the federal 18government or any political subdivision or instrumentality 19thereof.20    "Entombment right" means the right to place individual 21human remains or individual cremated human remains in a 22specific mausoleum crypt or lawn crypt selected by the 23consumer for use as a final resting place.24    "Interment right" means the right to place individual 25human remains or cremated human remains in a specific 26underground location selected by the consumer for use as a   HB1619 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1final resting place.2    "Inurnment right" means the right to place individual 3cremated human remains in a specific niche selected by the 4consumer for use as a final resting place.5    "Lawn crypt" means a permanent underground crypt usually 6constructed of reinforced concrete or similar material 7installed in multiple units for the entombment of human 8remains.9    "Imputed value" means the retail price of comparable 10rights within the same or similar area of the cemetery.11    "Average fair market value" means the average of the fair 12market values of assets held by the fund on the first day of 13the current fiscal year and the first day of each of the 2 14preceding fiscal years, or the average of the fair market 15value for the entire term of the fund if there are less than 2 16preceding years. 17    "Total return percentage" means the annual percentage 18selected by the fund's trustee or the cemetery authority, but 19no less than 3% and no more than 5% of the average fair market 20value of the fund.21    "Net income" means:22        (1) ordinary income, which means all net interest and 23    dividends, after fees and taxes taken from income, but 24    does not include any capital gains from the investment of 25    such care funds; or26        (2) total return distribution, which means the   HB1619 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1    distribution of funds from the care fund based on the 2    average fair market value of the fund assets multiplied by 3    the total return percentage. 4(Source: P.A. 92-651, eff. 7-11-02.) 5    (760 ILCS 100/3)  (from Ch. 21, par. 64.3)6    Sec. 3. Gifts and contributions - Trust funds. Any 7cemetery authority is hereby authorized and empowered to 8accept any gift, grant, contribution, payment, legacy, or 9pursuant to contract, any sum of money, funds, securities or 10property of any kind, or the income or avails thereof, and to 11establish a trust fund to hold the same in perpetuity for the 12care of its cemetery, or for the care of any lot, grave, crypt 13or niche in its cemetery; or for the special care of any lot, 14grave, crypt or niche or of any family mausoleum or memorial, 15marker, or monument in its cemetery.16    The cemetery authority shall act as trustee of all amounts 17received for care until they have been deposited into the 18trust fund established under this Section. The cemetery 19authority may continue to be the trustee of up to $500,000 of 20care funds that have been deposited into the trust fund, but 21the cemetery authority must retain an independent trustee for 22any amount of care funds held in trust in excess of that 23$500,000. A cemetery authority holding care funds in excess of 24$500,000 on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1996 25shall have 36 months to retain an independent trustee for the   HB1619 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1excess amounts held in trust; any other cemetery authority 2must retain an independent trustee for its care funds in 3excess of $500,000 as soon as may be practical.4    No gift, grant, legacy, payment or other contribution 5shall be invalid by reason of any indefiniteness or 6uncertainty as to the beneficiary designated in the instrument 7creating the gift, grant, legacy, payment or other 8contribution. If any gift, grant, legacy, payment or other 9contribution consists of non-income producing property, the 10cemetery authority accepting it is authorized and empowered to 11sell such property and to invest the funds obtained in 12accordance with the provisions of the next succeeding 13paragraph.14    The care funds authorized by this Section and provided for 15in Section 4 of this Act shall be held intact and, unless 16otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift, grant, legacy, 17contribution, payment, contract or other payment, as to 18investments made after June 11, 1951 the trustee of the care 19funds of the cemetery authority, in acquiring, investing, 20reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling and managing 21property for any such trust, shall exercise the judgment and 22care under the circumstances then prevailing, which persons of 23prudence, discretion and intelligence exercise in the 24management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation 25but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, 26considering the probable income as well as the probable safety   HB1619 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1of their capital. Within the limitations of the foregoing 2standard, the trustee of the care funds of the cemetery 3authority is authorized to acquire and retain every kind of 4property, real, personal or mixed, and every kind of 5investment, including specifically but without limiting the 6generality of the foregoing, bonds, debentures and other 7corporate obligations, preferred or common stocks and real 8estate mortgages, which persons of prudence, discretion and 9intelligence acquire or retain for their own account. Within 10the limitations of the foregoing standard, the trustee is 11authorized to retain property properly acquired, without 12limitation as to time and without regard to its suitability 13for original purchase. The care funds authorized by this 14Section may be commingled with other trust funds received by 15such cemetery authority for the care of its cemetery or for the 16care or special care of any lot, grave, crypt, niche, private 17mausoleum, memorial, marker, or monument in its cemetery, 18whether received by gift, grant, legacy, contribution, 19payment, contract or other conveyance heretofore or hereafter 20made to such cemetery authority. Such care funds may be 21invested with common trust funds as provided in the The Common 22Trust Fund Act. The net income only from the investment of such 23care funds shall be allocated and used for the purposes 24specified in the transaction by which the principal was 25established in the proportion that each contribution bears to 26the entire sum invested.  HB1619 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1(Source: P.A. 89-615, eff. 8-9-96.) 2    (760 ILCS 100/3.1 new)3    Sec. 3.1. Master trust fund. For the purposes of 4collective investment and administration, a trustee may apply 5to the Comptroller to establish a master trust fund in which 6deposits are made pursuant to the provisions of this Act. The 7operation of the master trust fund shall be subject to the 8provisions of this Act and rules applicable to this Act. The 9master trust fund shall be subject to the following 10requirements:11        (1) it shall include only cemetery authorities located 12    in this State that have given written consent to 13    participate in a master trust fund;14        (2) it must be administered by an independent trustee;15        (3) the trustee of a master trust fund shall maintain 16    separate records of principal and income for each 17    participant in the master trust fund;18        (4) the income and associated expenses of the master 19    trust fund shall be divided among the participants in the 20    master trust fund based on the proportion that each 21    participant contributes to the balance of the master trust 22    fund; and23        (5) the trustee shall make accounting records of the 24    trust, including a report that will include itemized 25    separate accounting for each participant in the master   HB1619 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1    trust fund, available for review and audit upon request by 2    the Comptroller. 3    (760 ILCS 100/4)  (from Ch. 21, par. 64.4)4    Sec. 4. Care funds; deposits; investments. 5    Whenever a cemetery authority owning, operating, 6controlling or managing a privately operated cemetery accepts 7care funds, either in connection with the sale or giving away 8at an imputed value of an interment right, entombment right or 9inurnment right, or in pursuance of a contract, or whenever, 10as a condition precedent to the purchase or acceptance of an 11interment right, entombment right or inurnment right, such 12cemetery authority requires the establishment of a care fund 13or a deposit in an already existing care fund, then such 14cemetery authority shall execute and deliver to the person 15from whom received an instrument in writing which shall 16specifically state: (a) the nature and extent of the care to be 17furnished, and (b) that such care shall be furnished only in so 18far as the net income derived from the amount deposited in 19trust will permit (the income from the amount so deposited, 20less necessary expenditures of administering the trust, shall 21be deemed the net income), and (c) that not less than the 22following amounts will be set aside and deposited in trust: 23        1. For interment rights, $1 per square foot of the 24    space sold or 15% of the sales price or imputed value, 25    whichever is the greater, with a minimum of $25 for each   HB1619 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1    individual interment right. 2        2. For entombment rights, not less than 10% of the 3    sales price or imputed value with a minimum of $25 for each 4    individual entombment right. 5        3. For inurnment rights, not less than 10% of the 6    sales price or imputed value with a minimum of $15 for each 7    individual inurnment right. 8        4. For any transfer of interment rights, entombment 9    rights, or inurnment rights recorded in the records of the 10    cemetery authority, excepting only transfers between 11    members of the immediate family of the transferor, a 12    minimum of $25 for each such right transferred. For the 13    purposes of this paragraph "immediate family of the 14    transferor" means the spouse, parents, grandparents, 15    children, grandchildren, and siblings of the transferor. 16        5. Upon an interment, entombment, or inurnment in a 17    grave, crypt, or niche in which rights of interment, 18    entombment, or inurnment were originally acquired from a 19    cemetery authority prior to January 1, 1948, a minimum of 20    $25 for each such right exercised. 21        6. For the special care of any lot, grave, crypt, or 22    niche or of a family mausoleum, memorial, marker, or 23    monument, the full amount received.24    Such setting aside and deposit shall be made by such 25cemetery authority not later than 30 days after the close of 26the month in which the cemetery authority gave away for an   HB1619 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1imputed value or received the final payment on the purchase 2price of interment rights, entombment rights, or inurnment 3rights, or received the final payment for the general or 4special care of a lot, grave, crypt or niche or of a family 5mausoleum, memorial, marker or monument; and such amounts 6shall be held by the trustee of the care funds of such cemetery 7authority in trust in perpetuity for the specific purposes 8stated in said written instrument. For all care funds received 9by a cemetery authority, except for care funds received by a 10cemetery authority pursuant to a specific gift, grant, 11contribution, payment, legacy, or contract that are subject to 12investment restrictions more restrictive than the investment 13provisions set forth in this Act, and except for care funds 14otherwise subject to a trust agreement executed by a person or 15persons responsible for transferring the specific gift, grant, 16contribution, payment, or legacy to the cemetery authority 17that contains investment restrictions more restrictive than 18the investment provisions set forth in this Act, the cemetery 19authority may, without the necessity of having to obtain prior 20approval from any court in this State, designate a new trustee 21in accordance with this Act and invest the care funds in 22accordance with this Section, notwithstanding any contrary 23limitation contained in the trust agreement.24    Any such cemetery authority engaged in selling or giving 25away at an imputed value interment rights, entombment rights 26or inurnment rights, in conjunction with the selling or giving   HB1619 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1away at an imputed value any other merchandise or services not 2covered by this Act, shall be prohibited from increasing the 3sales price or imputed value of those items not requiring a 4care fund deposit under this Act with the purpose of 5allocating a lesser sales price or imputed value to items that 6require a care fund deposit.7    In the event any sale that would require a deposit to such 8cemetery authority's care fund is made by a cemetery authority 9on an installment basis, and the installment contract is 10factored, discounted, or sold to a third party, the cemetery 11authority shall deposit the amount due to the care fund within 1230 days after the close of the month in which the installment 13contract was factored, discounted, or sold. If, subsequent to 14such deposit, the purchaser defaults on the contract such that 15no care fund deposit on that contract would have been 16required, the cemetery authority may apply the amount 17deposited as a credit against future required deposits.18    The trust authorized by this Section shall be a single 19purpose trust fund. In the event of the seller's bankruptcy, 20insolvency, or assignment for the benefit of creditors, or an 21adverse judgment, the trust funds shall not be available to 22any creditor as assets of the cemetery authority or to pay any 23expenses of any bankruptcy or similar proceeding, but shall be 24retained intact to provide for the future maintenance of the 25cemetery. Except in an action by the Comptroller to revoke a 26license issued pursuant to this Act and for creation of a   HB1619 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1receivership as provided in this Act, the trust shall not be 2subject to judgment, execution, garnishment, attachment, or 3other seizure by process in bankruptcy or otherwise, nor to 4sale, pledge, mortgage, or other alienation, and shall not be 5assignable except as approved by the Comptroller. The changes 6made by this amendatory Act of the 91st General Assembly are 7intended to clarify existing law regarding the inability of 8licensees to pledge the trust.9(Source: P.A. 91-7, eff. 6-1-99.) 10    (760 ILCS 100/4.1 new)11    Sec. 4.1. Distributions.12    (a) A cemetery authority may take distributions from its 13fund either by distributing: 14        (1) ordinary income; or 15        (2) total return distribution. 16    (b) If a cemetery authority takes distributions from its 17fund by total return distribution, the following apply:18        (1) Fees and taxes may be paid from corpus.19        (2) If the fees paid by the care fund exceed 2% of the 20    fair market value at the end of a given year, the amount in 21    excess shall be paid from the distributions. 22    (c) A cemetery authority may select a distribution method 23by delivering written instructions to the trustee of the fund 24no later than 30 days before the beginning of the calendar 25year. The distribution method and the distribution rate   HB1619 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1selected shall remain in effect unless the cemetery notifies 2the trustee of its desire to effect a change, application for 3the change has been submitted to the Comptroller as required 4in Section 4.2, and copies of the documentation are submitted 5to the trustee. If the trustee does not receive written 6instructions from the cemetery authority informing the trustee 7of the method of calculating chosen, then the trustee shall 8calculate and distribute based on the ordinary income 9distribution method. The trustee shall distribute income to 10the cemetery authority at least annually or in more frequent 11installments as agreed to by the trustee and cemetery 12authority.  13    (760 ILCS 100/4.2 new)14    Sec. 4.2. Application for total return distribution and 15restrictions.16    (a) An application for the implementation of the total 17return distribution method shall be submitted to the 18Comptroller at least 120 days before the effective date of the 19election to receive total return distribution. In addition to 20submitting payment of a reasonable application fee, the 21cemetery authority shall provide the Comptroller with all of 22the following:23        (1) A written investment policy. The investment goals 24    shall be to achieve principal growth through allowable 25    investments for care fund trusts with a secondary goal of   HB1619 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1    achieving current income. 2        (2) A care fund trust agreement that clearly shows the 3    selection of the total return distribution method. 4        (3) A written distribution policy establishing the 5    total return percentage and initial estimated average fair 6    market value, using the most recent month-end balances as 7    the estimate for the current year, signed by the cemetery 8    authority or trustee, along with supporting documentation 9    and additional information as may be required by the rules 10    adopted under this Act. 11    (b) The application shall be considered approved unless 12the cemetery authority or trustee is notified otherwise by the 13Comptroller within 90 days of receipt. The notification shall 14contain details of the information needed to remedy any 15deficiencies in the application. 16    (c) The total return percentage elected may be reduced but 17may not be increased unless additional application is made to 18the Comptroller with documentation demonstrating the rate of 19return of the care funds over the last 3 years to support an 20increase in the percentage. The total return distribution 21shall not exceed 5% of the average fair market value of the 22fund assets in a given calendar year. 23    (d) A cemetery authority that has elected the total return 24distribution method may elect to reconvert to the ordinary 25income distribution method by submitting written documentation 26to the Comptroller in support of the reconversion, including a   HB1619 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1copy of the trust agreement, notification on the proposed 2effective date of the reconversion, and any additional 3information required by the Comptroller. 4    (e) The Comptroller may take corrective measures, 5including reducing the total return percentage or requiring a 6distribution of only ordinary income for a year under one or 7more of the following circumstances: 8        (1) if the average fair market value of the care fund 9    from one 3-year period to the previous 3-year period 10    declines by 10% or more;11        (2) if the average fair market value of the care fund 12    declines by more than 30% during a rolling 5-year period; 13        (3) if the fair market value of the fund at the 14    beginning of a fiscal year is less than 80% of the fair 15    market value of the fund on the first day of the fiscal 16    year when the care fund started making distributions based 17    on the total return distribution method; 18        (4) if there is an uncorrected care fund deficiency as 19    determined by the Comptroller's review of the annual 20    report; or 21        (5) if the Comptroller determines that the trustee is 22    not able to demonstrate sufficient knowledge and expertise 23    regarding the effective implementation of distributing 24    income for the maintenance of the cemetery using the total 25    return distribution method. 26    (f) The Comptroller may evaluate the care fund conditions   HB1619 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1and choose not to impose corrective measures if the 2Comptroller finds that: 3        (1) the reasons are due to unusual or temporary 4    factors not within the control of the cemetery authority 5    or the trustee and that could not have been reasonably 6    anticipated; 7        (2) the current investment policy of the fund is 8    reasonably designed to protect the fund from further 9    declines in fair market value; or 10        (3) the exception appears to be both necessary and 11    appropriate for the continued protections of the care 12    fund.  13    (760 ILCS 100/5)  (from Ch. 21, par. 64.5)14    Sec. 5. No cemetery authority, nor any agent, servant, or 15employee of it, nor any other person, shall advertise, 16represent, guarantee, promise, or contract that perpetual 17care, permanent care, perpetual or permanent maintenance, care 18forever, continuous care, eternal care, everlasting care, or 19any similar or equivalent care, or care for any number of years 20of any cemetery or of any lot, grave, crypt or niche, or of any 21family mausoleum, memorial, marker, or monument, will be 22furnished: Provided, however, that any cemetery authority may 23advertise, represent, guarantee, promise or contract that care 24will be furnished from the net income only derived from funds 25held in trust as provided in Sections Section 3 and 4 of this   HB1619 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1Act; and may advertise, represent, guarantee, promise or 2contract that care will be given any lot, grave, crypt, or 3niche, or any family mausoleum, memorial, marker, or monument 4for any definite number of years, such care to be furnished 5under a contract providing that the principal of the amount 6paid under the contract shall be used to furnish the care and 7further providing specifically the care to be given and the 8number of years for which it is to be given.9(Source: Laws 1947, p. 338.) 10    (760 ILCS 100/14)  (from Ch. 21, par. 64.14)11    Sec. 14. The Comptroller may at any time investigate the 12cemetery business of every licensee with respect to its care 13funds. The Comptroller shall examine at least annually every 14licensee who has holds $250,000 or more in its care funds. For 15that purpose, the Comptroller shall have free access to the 16office and places of business and to such records of all 17licensees and of all trustees of the care funds of all 18licensees as shall relate to the acceptance, use and 19investment of care funds. The Comptroller may require the 20attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose 21testimony he may require relative to such business and in such 22cases the Comptroller or any qualified representative of the 23Comptroller whom the Comptroller may designate, may administer 24oaths to all such persons called as witnesses, and the 25Comptroller, or any such qualified representative of the   HB1619 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1Comptroller, may conduct such examinations. The cost of an 2initial examination shall be borne by the cemetery authority 3if it has $10,000 or more in such fund; otherwise, by the 4Comptroller. The charge made by the Comptroller for such 5examination shall be based upon the total amount of care funds 6held by the cemetery authority as of the end of the calendar or 7fiscal year for which a report is required by Section 12 of 8this Act and shall be in accordance with the following 9schedule:10    less than $10,000.........................no charge; 11    $10,000 or more but less than 12$50,000.............................................$10; 13    $50,000 or more but less than 14$100,000............................................$40; 15    $100,000 or more but less than 16$250,000............................................$80; 17    $250,000 or more....................................$100.18    Any licensee which is not required to be examined annually 19shall submit an annual report to the Comptroller containing 20such information as the Comptroller reasonably may request.21    The Comptroller may order additional audits or 22examinations as he or she may deem necessary or advisable to 23ensure the safety and stability of the trust funds and to 24ensure compliance with this Act. These additional audits or 25examinations shall only be made after good cause is 26established by the Comptroller in the written order. The   HB1619 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1grounds for ordering these additional audits or examinations 2may include, but shall not be limited to: 3        (1) material and unverified changes or fluctuations in 4    trust balances; 5        (2) the licensee changing trustees more than twice in 6    any 12-month period; 7        (3) any withdrawals or attempted withdrawals from the 8    trusts in violation of this Act; or 9        (4) failure to maintain or produce documentation 10    required by this Act for deposits into trust accounts or 11    trust investment activities.12    Prior to ordering an additional audit or examination, the 13Comptroller shall request the licensee to respond and comment 14upon the factors identified by the Comptroller as warranting 15the subsequent examination or audit. The licensee shall have 1630 days to provide a response to the Comptroller. If the 17Comptroller decides to proceed with the additional examination 18or audit, the licensee shall bear the full cost of that 19examination or audit, up to a maximum of $7,500. The 20Comptroller may elect to pay for the examination or audit and 21receive reimbursement from the licensee. Payment of the costs 22of the examination or audit by a licensee shall be a condition 23of receiving or maintaining a license under this Act. All 24moneys received by the Comptroller for examination or audit 25fees shall be maintained in a separate account to be known as 26the Comptroller's Administrative Fund. This Fund, subject to   HB1619 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1appropriation by the General Assembly, may be utilized by the 2Comptroller for enforcing this Act and other purposes that may 3be authorized by law.4(Source: P.A. 89-615, eff. 8-9-96.) 5    (760 ILCS 100/15a)  (from Ch. 21, par. 64.15a)6    Sec. 15a. Where any cemetery authority owning, operating, 7controlling or managing a privately operated cemetery or any 8trustee for the same has accepted care funds within the 9meaning of this Act, and is considered abandoned or seeks 10dissolution dissolution is sought by such cemetery authority 11in any manner, by resolution of such cemetery authority, or 12the trustees thereof, notice shall be given to the Comptroller 13of such intention to dissolve, and proper disposition shall be 14made of the care funds so held for the general benefit of such 15lot owners by or for the benefit of such cemetery authority, as 16provided by law, or in accordance with the trust provisions of 17any gift, grant, contribution, payment, legacy or pursuant to 18any contract whereby such funds were created. The Comptroller 19represented by the Attorney General may apply to the circuit 20court for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, successor in 21trust, or for directions of such court as to the proper 22disposition to be made of such care funds, to the end that the 23uses and purposes for which such trust or care funds were 24created may be accomplished. Where no such receiver is 25available, the circuit court may order a willing local   HB1619 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 08150 JRC 18198 b1municipality, township, county, or city to take over the 2cemetery. Any existing deed or care funds may be conveyed or 3transferred to the unit of local government. If there is no 4party available to convey the deed or transfer the care funds, 5then a judicial deed and court order may be obtained in the 6county in which the cemetery is located, and such deed or other 7writing, if it relates to land, shall promptly, after its 8execution by a judge or the sheriff, be recorded in the 9recorder's office of the county wherein the land is situated. 10Any cemetery taken over by a local municipality, township, 11county, or city shall be considered a municipal cemetery for 12the purposes of this Act.13(Source: P.A. 87-747; 88-477.) 14    (760 ILCS 100/25 rep.)15    Section 10. The Cemetery Care Act is amended by repealing 16Section 25. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 181, 2027.